Utah statutes.
17D-2-109.   Construction of this chapter -- Conflicts with other provisions.

(1)  To enable a local building authority to perform its essential governmental functions on behalf of its creating local entity, this chapter shall be liberally construed.

(2) (a)  If a provision of this chapter conflicts with another statutory provision, the provision of this chapter controls.

(b)  Subsection (2)(a) applies notwithstanding Section 11-14-403.

